Georgia, session 2025_26, HB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 13 of Chapter 2 of Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
food service establishments, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"26-2-378.1.
All food service establishments in this state that serve imported shrimp shall conspicuously
display on their menus a disclosure by each menu item containing shrimp stating
'FOREIGN IMPORTED,' or display 'FOREIGN IMPORTED SHRIMP' on placards visible
to the public. This Code section shall not apply to a food service establishment operated
by a state agency, as such term is defined in Code Section 48-8-14."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 1 -